South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4047.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 2, Title 61 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 61-2-270.  (A) During the hours of operation, a golf course may sell alcoholic liquor by the drink and beer and wine by the drink to a person twenty-one years of age or older for consumption throughout the golf course, provided that the golf course is licensed in South Carolina to sell alcoholic liquor by the drink and beer and wine by the drink for on-premise consumption. (B) A person twenty-one years of age or older may purchase and consume alcoholic liquor by the drink and beer and wine by the drink throughout the golf course, provided that the purchase is from a golf course that is licensed in South Carolina to sell alcoholic liquor by the drink for on-premise consumption. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----